Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 2
Merger [Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-12.1-1121.
Merger authorized. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

By complying with this part:

One or more domestic partnerships may merge with one or more domestic or foreign entities into a domestic or foreign surviving entity; and

Two (2) or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic partnership.

By complying with the provisions of this part applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be a party to a merger under this part or may be the surviving entity in such a merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1122.
Plan of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic partnership may become a party to a merger under this part by approving a plan of merger. The plan must be in a record and contain:

As to each merging entity, its name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

If the surviving entity is to be created in the merger, a statement to that effect and the entity’s name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

The manner of converting the interests in each party to the merger into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger, any proposed amendments to:

Its public organic record, if any; or

Its private organic rules that are, or are proposed to be, in a record;

If the surviving entity is to be created in the merger:

Its proposed public organic record, if any; and

The full text of its private organic rules that are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the merger; and

Any other provision required by the law of a merging entity’s jurisdiction of formation or the organic rules of a merging entity.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a plan of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1123.
Approval of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of merger is not effective unless it has been approved:

By a domestic merging partnership, by all the partners of the partnership entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

In a record, by each partner of a domestic merging partnership which will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the merger becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the partnership provides in a record for the approval of a merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner consented in a record to or voted for that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A merger involving a domestic merging entity that is not a partnership is not effective unless the merger is approved by that entity in accordance with its organic law.

A merger involving a foreign merging entity is not effective unless the merger is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1124.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of merger may be amended only with the consent of each party to the plan, except as otherwise provided in the plan.

A domestic merging partnership may approve an amendment of a plan of merger:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the merger is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by the interest holders of any party to the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the surviving entity that will be in effect immediately after the merger be effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the surviving entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of merger has been approved and before a statement of merger becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic merging partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of merger is abandoned after a statement of merger has been filed with the secretary of state and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by a party to the plan, must be filed with the secretary of state before the statement of merger becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the merger is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of each party to the plan of merger;

The date on which the statement of merger was filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the merger has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1125.
Articles of merger — Effective date of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Articles of merger must be signed by each merging entity and filed with the secretary of state.

Articles of merger must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of each merging entity that is not the surviving entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the surviving entity;

A statement that the merger was approved by each domestic merging entity, if any, in accordance with this part and by each foreign merging entity, if any, in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger and is a domestic filing entity, any amendment to its public organic record approved as part of the plan of merger;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment; and

If the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, a statement of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the surviving entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed.

If the surviving or resulting entity is not a domestic limited liability partnership or another filing entity of record in the office of the secretary of state, a statement that the surviving or resulting other entity agrees that it may be served with process in Rhode Island in any action, suit, or proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic limited liability partnership that is to merge, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in the action, suit, or proceeding and specifying the address to which a copy of the process is to be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service under this section on the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in §

7-12.1-912

are applicable, except that the plaintiff in any action, suit, or proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the articles of merger provided for in this section and any other address that the plaintiff elects to furnish, together with copies of the process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify the surviving or resulting other business entity at all addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

7-12.1-912

.

If the surviving entity is a domestic partnership, the merger becomes effective when the articles of merger are effective. In all other cases, the merger becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the surviving entity; and

When the articles of merger are effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1126.
Effect of merger. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving entity continues or comes into existence;

Each merging entity that is not the surviving entity ceases to exist;

All property of each merging entity vests in the surviving entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of each merging entity are debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the surviving entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of merger, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each merging entity vest in the surviving entity;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger:

All its property continues to be vested in it without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

It remains subject to all its debts, obligations, and other liabilities; and

All its rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes continue to be vested in it;

The name of the surviving entity may be substituted for the name of any merging entity that is a party to any pending action or proceeding;

If the surviving entity exists before the merger:

Its public organic record, if any, is amended as provided in the statement of merger; and

Its private organic rules that are to be in a record, if any, are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger, its private organic rules become effective and:

If it is a filing entity, its public organic record becomes effective; and

If it is a limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification becomes effective; and

The interests in each merging entity which are to be converted in the merger are converted, and the interest holders of those interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of merger and to any appraisal rights they have under §

7-12.1-1106

and the merging entity’s organic law.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a merging entity, the merger does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the merging entity.

When a merger becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to any of the merging entities and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the merger has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of that entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the merger becomes effective.

When a merger becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic merging partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The merger does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the merger became effective.

The person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the merger becomes effective.

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the merger had not occurred and the surviving entity were the domestic merging entity.

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the partnership agreement of the domestic merging partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the merger had not occurred.

When a merger has become effective, a foreign entity that is the surviving entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a domestic merging partnership as provided in §

7-12.1-119

.

When a merger has become effective, the registration to do business in this state of any foreign merging entity that is not the surviving entity is canceled.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.